Florida, session 2026, SB974.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (f) is added to subsection (7) of 15 section 381.986, Florida Statutes, to read: 16 381.986âMedical use of marijuana.â 17 (7)âIDENTIFICATION CARDS.â 18 (f)âThe department shall charge a reduced fee of $15 for 19 the issuance, replacement, or renewal of an identification card 20 for a qualified patient who is a veteran, as defined in s. 21 1.01(14), if the application includes a copy of any of the 22 following as proof of veteran status: 23 1.âA DD-214 form; 24 2.âA Department of Veterans Affairs identification card or 25 a Uniformed Services identification card indicating retired 26 status; or 27 3.âA Florida driver license bearing the veteran 28 designation. 29 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.